Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 47. Essex Community Education Center Union School District #46

Any transportation of students to and from the Union High School shall be the responsibility of each member District at its own discretion.

The negotiated agreements and individual contracts for Essex Junction Educational Center administrators, instructional and support staff shall be honored by the Union High School District until the expiration of the existing agreements/contracts or until
the Union High School District Board and the staff organizations represented negotiate new agreements/contracts.

The curriculum to be offered shall be the current Essex Junction Educational Center curriculum with any amendments made by the Essex Junction Prudential Committee before the Union High School District is formed or by the Union High School Board after
the Union High School District is formed.

706b(6) The indebtedness of the proposed member districts which the union shall assume.

Decision:
The Union High School District shall not assume the indebtedness of the proposed member Districts, except as necessary to replace the roof of the Essex Junction Educational Center if required prior to the effective
date of the Union.

706b(7) The specific properties of proposed member Districts which the Union is to acquire, their valuation, and how the union shall pay for them.

Decision:
The specific properties which the Union is to acquire are the buildings and the land known as the Essex Junction Educational Center (the high school, technical center, skating facility, including the contents appropriate
to the function of these facilities and the office building).

The valuation of said property is set at Thirteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($13,500,000.00). The Essex Town School District will pay the Essex Junction School District Six Million Seven Hundred and Fifty Thousand Dollars ($6,750,000.00) as
its share of these facilities and properties, to be funded with the proceeds of bonds issued in accordance with 24 V.S.A. Ch. 53. This union is dependent upon the Essex Town Citizens approving this bond. Upon receipt of this payment,
the Essex Junction School District will convey the above mentioned facilities and properties to the Union High School District.

706b(8) The allocation of capital and operating expenses of the union among the member districts.

Decision:
Annual capital and operating expenses of the Union High School District shall be allocated on a per pupil basis using the most current first 40 day average Daily Membership enrollment as reported to the State Department
of Education, excluding the Technical Center enrollment.

706b(9) The method of apportioning the representation which each proposed member District shall have on the Union School Board. The Union School Board shall have no more than eighteen members, and each member District shall be entitled to at least one
representative.

Decision:
The Union High School District Board Representation shall be on a per capita basis - one Board member for every 4,000 residents or any portion thereof in a given member District based on the most recent decennial census.

The initial representation shall be as follows:

Village of Essex Junction - 8,396 residence = 3 members

Town of Essex - 8,102 residence = 3 members

The representation shall be subject to reapportionment following each decennial census.

706b(10) The term of Office of Directors initially elected shall be arranged so that one-third expire on the day of the second annual meeting of the respective Districts, one-third on the day of the third annual meeting of the respective Districts, and
one-third on the day of the fourth annual meeting of the respective Districts, or as near to that proportion as possible.

Decision:
The term of Office of Directors initially elected shall be arranged so that one Director’s term from each member District will expire on the day of the second annual meeting of the respective Districts, one Director’s
term from each member District will expire on the day of the third annual meeting of the respective Districts, and one Director’s term from each member District will expire on the day of the fourth annual meeting of the respective
Districts.

706b(11) The date on which the union proposal will be submitted to the voters.

Decision:
The Union High School District proposal shall be submitted to the voters of Essex Junction School District and Essex Town School District on 6/6/95.

706b(12) Any other matters which the Committee considers pertinent.

A.
Tuition students from Essex Town who will be

juniors and seniors
attending present State approved tuition receiving schools in the

1995-96
school year may elect to complete their studies and graduate from these same schools with allowable tuition being paid by the Essex Town School District. These students will not be counted in determining the initial
allocation of capital and operating expenses unless designated as Special Education students of the Union High School District.

B.
The Union High School shall be known as the

Essex Community Educational Center.

C.
It is recommended that the newly formed Union High School District be assigned by the State Board of Education to the Chittenden Central Supervisory Union.

The Chair person of the Union High School District Board shall be a voting member of the Union School Board.

If the vote on 6/6/95 is affirmed by both districts then the newly elected School Board shall take office at the time of the organization meeting. The Board’s first order of business will be to commence planning and take the necessary actions to cause
the Union High School to be operational for the fall of 1996.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1962
Fair Haven, Orwell, and Benson voted yes on the articles below.

1963
Castleton and West Haven requested and were granted permission to join the union district school.

Shall the town school district join in the formation of a union high school district, as provided by law, to consist of the town school districts of Fair Haven, Orwell, and Benson, subject to the following agreements as to the operation of such union
district:

(a)

Type of High School.
The union high school district shall operate as a high school having a four-year course consisting of grades 9, 10, 11, and 12;

(b)

Location.
The union high school shall be located in the building presently occupied by the Fair Haven High School, in the Town of Fair Haven, and any additions thereto that the union district may from time to time provide;

(c)

Building Costs.
Following the organization of the union high school district, the board of school directors of the Town of Fair Haven Town School District will enter into an arrangement with the union high school district to lease
the school district for an annual sum to equal the annual interest cost and bond redemption requirements on the bond issue against the present high school building, for the remaining life of said bonds, by the terms of which lease
arrangement the union high school district will upon final liquidation of said bonded debt acquire title to said building, and school lot;

(d)

Board of School Directors.
The school board of the union high school district shall consist of one member from each member district for each 50 students or fraction thereof, calculated as in subsection (f) of this agreement. Each member district
shall have at least one member on the union high school district board of school directors;

(e)

Transportation.
The high school students will be transported from each member district, and the cost of such transportation will be treated as a part of the operating expense of the union high school, and paid for by the union high
school district;

(f)

Student Enrollment.
Student enrollment shall include all students residing in a member district, and enrolled on October 15 of any school year, in grades 9, 10, 11, and 12 in a public school, except that a student from any member district
who is enrolled in grade 11 or 12 in a public school outside the union district on October 15 of the calendar year his district votes to become a member of the union high school district shall not be included in this student enrollment,
unless he subsequently attends the said union high school;

(g)

Apportionment of Expenses.

The School Districts of the Town of Greensboro and the Town of Stannard are necessary for the establishment of the proposed Union Elementary School District.

There are no additional school districts the Committee considers advisable to be included in the proposed Union Elementary School District.

The Union Elementary School District shall be established for a class grade level from kindergarten through 6.

No new schools are to be constructed.

A. Current contracts for transportation shall be completed by the member districts. On the completion of these contracts the Union Elementary School District may provide transportation.

B.
The negotiated agreements and individual contracts for Greensboro Town School teachers, administrators, aides and custodians shall be honored by the Union Elementary School District until such time as the
Union Elementary School District Board and the staff organizations negotiate new agreements for the Union Elementary School District.

C.
The curriculum to be offered for grades kindergarten through 6 shall be the current Greensboro Town School curriculum with any amendments made before the Union is formed or by the Union board after the Union
is formed.

D.
The Union shall be responsible for all required special education of pupils residing in member Districts.

The Union Elementary School District shall assume all the rights and liabilities of the Greensboro Town School District relating to the Greensboro School Building except bonded indebtedness.

The Greensboro Town School District shall convey the present elementary school, its contents and grounds to the Union Elementary School District. Interest in those premises shall be transferred by deed creating a fee interest which is subject to condition
upon the first to occur of the dissolution of the Union Elementary School District or the failure of the Union Elementary School District to make payments required under paragraph 5. At that time the Greensboro Town School
district shall have a right to enter and reclaim the premises, without instituting any action in the nature of foreclosure or otherwise. In the event that the Union Elementary School District is dissolved, the Greensboro Town
School district shall pay to the town of Stannard an amount equal to its contributions to the Union Elementary School District for capital payments, under interest shall be included in the payment.

Capital and operating expenses of the Union School District, including payments under paragraph 9, shall be allocated between the member districts on a per pupil basis, using the enrollment of legal pupils who are residents of the member districts as
of October 15 of the preceding year. Such capital and operating expenses shall be separately stated in each annual assessment. “Enrollment”, for purposes of this agreement, means legal pupils attending grades Kindergarten
through 6 at public expense. Only the Union Elementary School Board may waive assessments an students attending schools outside the Union.

In order to pay existing debt obligations, the Union Elementary School District shall make capital payments to the Greensboro Town School District on or before November 1 of each year from 1488 through 2004 in an amount equal to the obligation of the
Greensboro Town School District due to its bondholders on the Following December 1 under its 1986 series B bonds issued through the Vermont Municipal Bank. The Greensboro Elementary School District shall retain its obligations
under those bonds.

If the Union Elementary School District should sell or otherwise dispose of the present elementary school, the proceeds shall be divided between the Greensboro Town School District and the Stannard Town School District, after first paying to the Greensboro
Town School District an amount equal to any remaining principal on its 1986 series B bonds issued by the Vermont Municipal Bond Bank. The amount distributed to Greensboro shall be in proportion to its original contribution
plus capital payments made to the Union District under this agreement. “Original contribution” for the purposes of this agreement means the sum of $422,254.23.

The amount distributed to Stannard shall be in proportion to its capital payments made to the Union District under this agreement. Upon that sale or disposition, the reversionary interest of the Greensboro Town School District in the property shall be
extinguished.

The Union Elementary School District Board representation shall be proportional to the population according to the most recent census. Annually, one member shall be elected Chairman by the Board and shall be a non-voting member except when necessary
to break a tie. The representation shall be subject to reapportionment following each decennial census.

The initial representation shall be as follows:

Greensboro Town = 6 members

Stannard Town = 2 members

The terms of office of the Union Elementary School District Board members shall be as follows:

The Town of Stannard shall have two Directors who will serve three year terms upon the establishment of the following schedule. The Town of Greensboro shall have six Directors who will serve three year terms upon the establishment of the following schedule.

Schedule:

1988 - 2 Greensboro (1 yr. terms)

- 1 Stannard - 2 Greensboro (2 yr. terms)

- 1 Stannard - 2 Greensboro (3 yr. terms)

1989 - 0 Stannard - 2 Greensboro (3 yr. terms)

1990 - 1 Stannard - 2 Greensboro (3 yr. terms)

The Union Elementary School District proposal shall be submitted to the voters of the Town of Stannard and the Town of Greensboro an February 25, 1988.

The Union Elementary School District shall be named by the Union Board following suggestions from students after approval of the Union Elementary School District.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1964
Cambridge and Johnson each voted yes on the article below:

1965
Belvidere, Eden, Hyde Park, and Waterville requested and were granted permission to join the Union District.

Shall the Town School District join in the formation of a Union High School District, as provided by statute, for grades seven through 12, to consist of the Town School Districts of Cambridge and Johnson, the representation on the Union High School District
Board of Directors to be three members from Cambridge Town School District and three members from Johnson Town School District.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1967
Brookline, Jamaica, Townshend and Wardsboro each voted yes on the articles below.

1968
Wardsboro requested and was granted permission to withdraw from the union.

1969
Windham requested and was granted admission to Union.

ARTICLE I

Shall the Town School District join in the formation of a Union High School District, as provided by law, to consist of the Town School District of Brookline, Jamaica, Townshend and Wardsboro, upon the following conditions, namely:

(a)
TYPE OF SCHOOL. The Union High School District shall operate a high school offering instruction in grades 9 through 12.

(b)
REPRESENTATION. Each member district entitled to one representative on the Board of School Directors of the proposed Union School District for each 15 students or major fraction thereof residing in the member
district and enrolled in grades 9 through 12 of any public school at public expense on October 15 of the previous school year. Each member district shall have at least one representative on the Union School Board, in any
event.

(c)
APPORTIONMENT OF EXPENSES. The expenses incurred by the Union High School District shall be divided among the several member districts in the same proportion which the students enrollment from each district
bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1995
Pawlet and Rupert voted yes to the following article and final report:

Shall Pawlet/Rupert School District join with the Rupert/Pawlet School District for the purpose of forming a Union Elementary School District.

Final Report

Article 1.

The districts necessary for the establishment of the proposed union elementary school are the School Districts of the Town of Pawlet and the Town of Rupert.

Article 2.

There are no additional school districts the committee considers advisable to be included in the proposed union.

Article 3.

The union elementary school district shall be established for the class levels K-6, and as permitted or required by law, Pre-Kindergarten education.

Article 4.

The proposed location for the union elementary school will be in either the Town of Pawlet or the Town of Rupert. The estimated cost for building the union school is $2,750,000.

Article 5.

Current contracts for transportation shall be completed by the member districts. On completion of these contracts, the union elementary school district may provide transportation in accordance with

16 V.S.A. § 1222
or other statutory requirements concerning transportation of students.

Initially, the curriculum will follow the combined curricula of the Rupert and Pawlet Districts Schools which meet the requirements of the Vermont State Statutes and, in addition, shall meet any requirements that shall be established by the union district
school board.

All collective bargaining agreements of the member school districts negotiated prior to the formation of the union elementary school district shall be honored by the union elementary school district until the earlier of either (a) or (b) below:

(a)
The union elementary school district board and staff organizations negotiate new agreements for the union elementary school district.

(b)
The term of the agreement(s) expires. In the absence of a specific end date, the end date is defined as the end of the fiscal year in which the Union School opens.

Article 6.

The union elementary school district shall assume all the member school districts’ assets and liabilities acquired or incurred in the planning or construction of the new union school. All other member school districts’ assets or liabilities acquired or
incurred prior to the formation of the union elementary school district, except as otherwise set forth in these Articles of Agreement, shall remain the assets and liabilities of the member school districts.

Article 7.

The contents of the Pawlet School District and the Rupert School District shall be transferred to the new union elementary school district. Any items not required by the new union school shall remain the property of the original district owner. The land
and structures of the Rupert and Pawlet School districts shall remain the property of the original district owner.

Article 8.

Capital, operating, and General Mainstream Special Education costs of the union elementary school district, after deduction of tuition receipts, will be shared between the member districts based on the average daily attendance at the union school of pupils
who are residents of the member districts for the first 40 days of the prior school year of which school was in session.

The General Mainstream Special Education Costs shall include the cost for learning specialists, speech and language pathologists, and general teacher assistants.

Additional services for individual special education students will be billed back to the district of residency. These services shall include, but not be limited to, individual teacher assistants, counseling, occupational therapy, physical therapy, specialized
equipment, and specialized transportation.

Article 9.

The school directors shall be structured as to reflect the total population of each member town as defined by the US Census data taken every ten years. The union elementary school district shall have a seven person governing board.

According to the 1990 US Census population statistics, there are 1,314 people in Pawlet and 654 people in Rupert. Each member district shall have one board member for each 281 residents.

The 2000 US Census will be used to adjust the make up of the board for the election following the tenth anniversary of the vote to establish the union. This adjustment will continue in the same manner every ten years thereafter.

Union School Directors shall be elected by the registered voters of the member district which they represent in accordance with the provisions of

16 V.S.A. § 706e
.

Annually, one member of the school board will be elected chairperson by the board. The chairperson shall be a voting member of the board.

Article 10.

The initial members of the new union district school board shall be elected in accordance with the provisions of

16 V.S.A. §§ 706e
and 706f (Article II). The terms of office of directors shall follow guidelines set forth in § 706b(10) of the Vermont State Statutes. Initially, the terms of the school directors shall be as follows:

Pawlet Rupert

2 Two-year 1 Two year

2 Two-year 1 Two year

1 Three-year 1 Three year

Subsequently, all directors will be annually elected to three year terms in accordance with

16 V.S.A. §§ 706b(10)
and 706m.

This Agreement made and concluded this 26th day of July, 1954, and amended on November 4, 2003, by and between the following school districts, the Town School District of the Town of Bridport, the Town School District of the Town of Cornwall, the Town
School District of the Town of Ripton, the Town School District of the Town of Salisbury, the Town School District of the Town of Shoreham, the Town School District of the Town of Weybridge, all municipal corporations organized
and existing under and by virtue of the laws of the State of Vermont, and the Incorporated School District Number Four in Middlebury, an Incorporated School District organized and existing under and by virtue of the laws
of the State of Vermont.

WHEREAS
the aforesaid school districts have all respectively voted in favor of consolidating with each other for the purpose of forming a Union School District pursuant to the authority contained in No. 202 of the
Acts of 1953 at their own respective Town School District Meetings, which said votes were conditioned upon said Union School District being organized and operated in accordance with the provisions of said Act except as
modified by certain agreements entered into by said school districts forming said Union School District;

WHEREAS
the said voters of said school districts by said votes respectively authorized each of said school districts to enter into agreements with each other concerning the formation of said Union School District
which said Agreements were respectively set forth in the respective warnings for said meetings at which said votes were taken;

AND WHEREAS
the Commissioner of Education has temporarily designated the Union School formed by the aforesaid school districts as No. 3 Union School District, which said Union School District is now composed of the aforesaid
school districts as member districts;

NOW THEREFORE, THIS AGREEMENT WITNESSETH.

The aforesaid respective School Districts do hereby mutually agree with each other, for themselves and their successors, in consideration of the following agreements herein mutually agreed upon by each of the aforesaid school districts, that said Union
School District shall be organized and operated in accordance with the following agreements:

1.
That said Union School District shall operate as a middle school and a high school having a six year course consisting of grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12.

2.
That said middle school and high school shall be located within the territorial limits of the Town of Middlebury.

3.
That the expense of transportation of pupils to said middle school and high school shall be divided among the member districts in proportion to the student enrollment, as hereinafter defined, in said middle
and high school from each member district.

4.
That student enrollment shall include all students residing in a member district and enrolled for the whole or a part of a given school year in grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 in said middle and high school
as determined by the Average Daily Membership (ADM), as defined by state law, of the first 40 days of the prior school year.

5.
That upon the legal vote of the Town School District of Bridport to enroll grade 7 students and grade 8 students in said Union School District No. 3, Bridport Town School District may enroll students in grade
7 and grade 8 in said middle school beginning with the school year following the date of said positive legal vote.

6.
That all expenses, including transportation, building, maintaining and operating said Union School District No. 3 shall be divided among the member districts proportional to the student enrollment, as above
defined, in each member district in relation to the total student enrollment. It is further agreed that, beginning with the 2006-2007 school year, said expenses shall be apportioned among the member districts based on the
prior three-year average of the Average Daily Membership (ADM).

7.
That the school board of said Union School District No. 3 shall consist of directors to be elected by the member districts at their respective annual meetings. Beginning with the election held in March 2005,
the total number of directors shall be fixed at 13, and each member district shall be entitled to a number of directors proportional to the number of registered voters in each member district in relation to the total number
of registered voters in the seven towns of the Union School District No. 3. The number of voters shall be determined on the basis of the voter checklist as of March 31, 2004, and beginning on March 31, 2009, and each five
years thereafter, the proportional representation for the next five ensuing elections, subject to the provision that each individual member district shall be entitled to at least one board member. For example, the proportions
of registered voters in the member districts as of March 31, 2009 will establish the number of directors from each district for the elections in March 2010 and 2014, with at least one director from each member district.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF
the Town School Districts hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed in their names by their respective school directors and the Incorporated School District Number Four in Middlebury has caused this
Agreement to be executed in its name by its Prudential Committee, the day and year first above written.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1973
Clarendon and Wallingford each voted yes to the following articles. It appears that Shrewsbury also voted yes at the same time, although we could find no record of the vote.

ARTICLE I

Shall the town school district of Clarendon/Wallingford, which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed union school district, join with the school district of Wallingford/Clarendon, which the State Board of Education
has found necessary to include in the proposed union school district, and the school district of Shrewsbury, which the State Board of Education has found advisable to include in the proposed union school district, for the
purpose of forming a union school district, as provided in Title 16, Vermont Statutes Annotated, upon the following conditions and agreements:

(a)
Class of schools. The union school district shall operate and manage a high school, offering instruction in grades 7 through 12.

(b)
Board of School Directors. Each member district shall be entitled to one member of the Board of School Directors of the union school district for each one hundred (100) students, or fraction thereof, residing
in a member district and enrolled in the union school district on the fortieth school day of the year preceding the annual union school district election. Each member district shall have at least one representative on the
Union Board in any event.

(c)
Apportionment of Expenses. The allocation of capital and operating expenses among the member districts will be based on the enrolled pupils from each district and in accordance with Vermont state laws. (Section
711 of Title 16, Chapter 11, Vermont Statutes Annotated.)

(d)
Final Report. The provisions of the final report approved by the State Board of Education on the 16th day of October 1973, which is on file in the town clerk’s office, shall govern the union district.

Final Report

Item #1 - Clarendon and Wallingford school districts are considered necessary to the establishment of the proposed union.

Item #2 - The addition of the school district of Shrewsbury is considered advisable in the establishment of the proposed union.

Item #3 - The class of school to be operated in the proposed union is a union school, grades 7 through 12.

Item #4 - The new school will be located in the town of Clarendon. The capacity of the school as planned will be 700 pupils at a cost of $2,500,00.00 - $3,000,000.00.

Item #5a - The union will transport students in grades 7 through 12 for member towns.

Item #5b - Teaching Staff - The proposed union will have an adequate teaching staff in order to take care of individual student needs.

Item #5c - Curriculum (enclosed)

Item #6 - Indebtedness - None

Item #7 - Properties to be acquired from member districts - None

Item #8 - The allocation of capital and operating expenses among the member districts will be based on the enrolled pupils from each district and in accordance with Vermont state laws. Section 711 of Title 16 Vermont statutes annotated.

Item #9 - Board of School Directors - Each member district shall be entitled to one member of the Board of School Directors of the Union School District for each 100 students, or fraction thereof, residing in a member district and enrolled in the Union
School District on the fortieth school day of the year preceding the annual Union School District election. Each member district shall have at least one representative on the Union Board in any event.

Item #10 - Term of office shall be as follows:

Shrewsbury - 1-3-year term to expire 3/77

Wallingford - 1-2-year term to expire 3/76

Wallingford - 1-3-year term to expire 3/77

Clarendon - 1-2-year term to expire 3/76

Clarendon - 1-3-year term to expire 3/77

Item #11 - The union proposal will be submitted to the voters on Tuesday, November 27, 1973.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1970
Wheelock and Sheffield each voted to form a union school district and agreed to articles which have since been amended in Article 9.

1978
Article 9 amended.

1.
That the School Districts of Wheelock and Sheffield are necessary for the establishment of the proposed union.

2.
That only Wheelock and Sheffield are advisable at this time.

3.
That a K-12 Union School District be proposed. Grades 9-12 shall continue to be educated at Lyndon Institute on a tuition basis.

4.
That the cost approximate $150,000, including a proposed building site on the North side of Route 122 about 3/4 of a mile from Sheffield Village and about 1 mile from Wheelock Village.

5. (a)
That transportation be the responsibility of the Union School board members.

(b)
That the teaching staff be composed of four regular teachers and curriculum be as basic and as broad as can be provided.

6.
That no indebtedness exists.

7.
That there shall be no purchases of existing facilities.

8.
That the capital and operating expenses be based on the A.D.M. present formula.

9.
That each sending town of the Union District shall be entitled to three members on the Union District No. 37 School Board.

10.
That the School Director’s terms shall be staggered on a one year, two year, and three year term of office.

11.
That the Union proposal be submitted to the voters of each town as soon as possible in accordance with the Statutes.

12.
That the Wheelock elementary pupils will be using temporary quarters in the Wheelock Town Hall following destruction of the school by fire on December 3, 1969. Sheffield elementary school facilities are outmoded
and overcrowded.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1958
Swanton and Highgate each voted yes on the articles below.

1968
Franklin requested and was granted permission to send its grades 7-12 to the Union District School.

ARTICLE 1: To see if the voters of the Town School District of Swanton/Highgate will vote to enter into the following agreement with the Town School District of Highgate/Swanton with regard to division between them of the expense of building, maintaining
and operating such union high school as may be established pursuant to the vote of these districts taken on March 4, 1958:

(a)
Of the portion of the construction cost to be paid by Highgate and Swanton in combination, Highgate will pay 40% and Swanton will pay 60%.

(b)
Each district shall contribute to the cost of maintaining and operating said school, and of conducting the general business of the union high school district in the proportion that the number of legally enrolled
pupils attending said union district high school residing in that member district bears to the total number of students enrolled in said union district high school between July 1 and December 31 of the previous school year.
During the first year of operation of said union district high school the proportion which each town school district shall pay shall be in the ratio which the number of resident pupils in its high school bears to the total
combined enrollment of resident pupils in grades 7 to 12 inclusive in both the Swanton and Highgate Schools during the previous school year.

=font8

2000
Swanton, Franklin and Highgate each voted yes on the following article.

Shall the method of apportioning the expenses of the Missisquoi Valley Union High School District (Union District #7) among its members districts, be amended to calculate each member district’s proportion share of expenses based on the average enrollment
of students from the member district during the first forty (40) days of the school year (“ADM”) averaged over two consecutive years, the latter being the current school year.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1966
Bristol, Lincoln and Monkton voted to form a union school district. Later in that year Starksboro and New Haven voted to join on a 9-12 basis.

We have been unable to find a record of the article to which the voters agreed.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1962
Bennington and North Bennington incorporated school districts and Shaftsbury voted yes on the articles below.

1962
Pownal and Woodford requested and were granted permission to join the Union District.

Article 1.
To determine by ballot whether the voters of this district will vote to join a Union School District, the members of which district will be the Greater Bennington, the North Bennington Graded, the Shaftsbury
Town and the Bennington Graded school districts, such Union School District to be formed pursuant to the authority granted by Vermont Statutes Annotated, Chapter 11, Title 16 thereof, and operated in accordance with the
provisions of said statutes except as modified by the following agreements entered into by the districts which become members of the Union School District:

(a)
Said Union School District shall operate schools covering Grades 7 through 12.

(b)
The Senior High School, grades 9 through 12, shall be located in a new building within the limits of the Town of Bennington.

(c)
The present high school building of the Bennington Graded School District shall be used to house the Junior High School, grades 7 and 8.

(d)
All expenses of the Union School District, including by way of specification without limitation thereby, building, acquisition and construction coats, amortization of indebtedness and maintenance and operation
shall be computed separately for the Senior High School and the Junior High School.

(e)
The expense of the transportation provided for pupils who attend schools from the member districts of the Union School District shall be paid for by the Union District.

(f)
Al1 expense of the Union Senior High School of the Union District as computed in accordance with (d) above shall be divided among the member districts in the proportion which 9th through 12th grade enrollment
in each member district for the previous school year bears to the total number of 9th through 12th grade students enrolled in said year from all the districts that are members of the Union School District.

(g)
All expenses of the Union Junior High School of the Union District as computed in accordance with (d) above shall be divided among the member districts in the proportion which 7th and 8th grade enrollment
in each member district for the previous school year bears to the total number of 7th and 8th grade students enrolled in said year from all the districts that are members of the Union School District.

(h)
Student enrollment shall not include students residing in member districts who are enrolled in private schools located outside the Union School District or in private schools located within the Union School
District. A private school pupil residing within the Union District who takes not more than two courses in a school year at a school operated by the Union School District shall not be regarded as a student enrolled in such
union school in determining the student enrollment of a member district.

Student enrollment shall include all students residing in member districts and attending a public school in grades 7-12 and they shall be the base on which the expense to the member towns is computed. Students in grades 11-12 residing within the member
districts, but attending schools outside the District, shall be allowed to continue to the natural completion of their course of instruction with their whole tuition being paid by the Union District.

The Board of Directors of the Union School District shall consist of three directors from each member District as such member District is constituted at the time the Union District is organized.

Tuition students may be permitted to attend the Union Junior-Senior High School. All tuition students normally shall enter Grade 7. Exceptions shall be regulated by the Union Board.

Tuition cost shall be the calculated net cost per pupil which member towns pay exclusive of transportation and other costs as specified in

16 V.S.A. § 793
, as amended.

It is to be understood at the outset that neighboring towns wishing at some future date to join this Union shall do so on a 7 through 12 basis. This is in the interest of educational continuity, scheduling efficiency and control of educational costs.
Additional member districts shall have representation on the Union District Board. This representation shall be one per each 100 pupils or major fraction thereof with a minimum of one from a proposed member town.

It is agreed that no vote for a bond issue will be held within one year of the time the Union becomes a body politic.

These articles may be amended subject to Title 16 Sub-Chap. 93 Section 693.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1954
Will the Randolph/Braintree Town School District consolidate with the Braintree/Randolph Town School District for the purpose of forming a Union High School District as provided by No. 202 of the Acts of 1953?

1966
The Town School District of Brookfield requested and was granted admission to Union High School District No. 2 on a 7-12 basis.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1987
Barre City and Barre Town voted yes to form a union school district and agreed to articles which have since been amended in Section 8.

1995
Articles amended in Section 8.

The School Districts of Barre City and Barre Town are necessary for the establishment of the proposed Union High School District.
